South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1048.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  After the effective date of this act, any new single-family homes in the Blue Ridge Community, as established by Act 108 of 2021 and as amended by Act 14 of 2025, must be constructed on a tract of land comprised of not less than five acres. SECTION 2.  After the effective date of this act, any new multi-family dwellings in the Blue Ridge Community must be constructed on a tract of land comprised of not less than five acres for each dwelling unit in the multi-family dwelling. SECTION 3.  The provisions of this act do not apply to a person to whom a tract of land comprised of less than five acres is conveyed, bequeathed, or devised from a family member if the person maintains ownership of the tract for his use and enjoyment or the use and enjoyment of his immediate family. SECTION 4.  The provisions of this act do not apply to a person who owns less than five acres of real property in the Blue Ridge Community prior to the effective date of this act. SECTION 5.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----